District of Columbia statutes.
29-1001.03

Nature of limited cooperative association.

(a)

A limited cooperative association organized under this chapter shall be an autonomous, unincorporated association of persons united to meet their mutual interests through a jointly owned enterprise primarily controlled by those persons, which permits combining:

(1)

Ownership, financing, and receipt of benefits by the members for whose interests the association is formed; and

(2)

Separate investments in the association by members who may receive returns on their investments and a share of control.

(b)

The fact that a limited cooperative association does not have one or more of the characteristics described in subsection (a) of this section shall not alone prevent the association from being formed under, and governed by, this chapter and shall not alone provide a basis for an action against the association.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 104 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.